Hawaii, session 2025, GM1388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that unintentional falls
among seniors age sixty-five years and older in Hawaii are the
leading cause of fatal injuries (an average of forty-nine per
cent) and injury-related emergency room visits (an average of
sixty-one per cent). On average, one hundred and fourteen
seniors die, ten thousand are treated in hospitals, and six
thousand one hundred are treated in emergency departments as a
result of falls.
The legislature further finds that falls among the elderly
also result in over $100,000,000 in combined hospital charges
each year. In recognition of this critical public health issue.
Act 153, Session Laws of Hawaii 2014 (Act 153) , established and
provided funding for a fall prevention and early detection
coordinator position within the department of health's emergency
medical services and injury prevention system branch. This
position enables the department of health to support a
2025-3410 HB474 GDI HMSO

Page 2 474
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
coordinated statewide approach to prevent and reduce the impact
of falls among older adults.
The legislature also finds that access to fall prevention
services and programs would significantly reduce costs
associated with falls among older adults by expediting
treatment, minimize serious long-term consequences, reduce the
extent of the injury, and, in some instances, avoid death.
Falls among older adults are a significant public health
issue. Yet, there are insufficient resources to develop a
coordinated statewide approach to reduce and promptly detect
falls among seniors. A dedicated fall prevention program can
serve as a focal point for statewide injury prevention and
detection efforts to ensure multidisciplinary support,
coordination of prevention and detection efforts, and continuity
of implementation and accountability.
The legislature additionally finds that continued support
of fall prevention programs and services ultimately results in
longer, healthier lives for the State's aging population.
The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the
department of health for the current fall prevention campaign.
2025-3410 HB474 CDl HMSO
iiiMiiiiMiiiiiiinnM

Page 3
H.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $100,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the department of health's current fall prevention
campaign.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of health for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3410 HB474 CDl HMSO
iMiiininiiiiiHiiii

H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 474, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 474, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
259